Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3134
Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3134 to 77-3143 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 14.